Maryland, session 2026, HB0724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 20–601(b) through (k) of Article – State Government of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 20–601(c) through (l), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Government
20–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “CAREGIVER STATUS” MEANS THE STATUS OF BEING AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO PROVIDES DIRECT AND ONGOING CARE FOR:
(1) A MINOR CHILD; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A DISABILITY WHO:
(I) RELIES ON THE CAREGIVER FOR MEDICAL CARE OR TO
MEET THE NEEDS OF DAILY LIFE; AND
(II) 1. IS IN A FAMILIAL RELATIONSHIP WITH THE
CAREGIVER, INCLUDING:
A. THE CAREGIVER’S CHILD;
B. THE CAREGIVER’S SPOUSE;
C. THE CAREGIVER’S DOMESTIC PARTNER;
D. THE CAREGIVER’S PARENT;
E. THE CAREGIVER’S SIBLING;
F. THE CAREGIVER’S GRANDCHILD;
G. THE CAREGIVER’S GRANDPARENT;

HOUSE BILL 724 3
H. THE CHILD OR PARENT OF THE CAREGIVER’S SPOUSE
OR DOMESTIC PARTNER; OR
I. ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL IN A FAMILIAL RELATIONSHIP
RECOGNIZED BY THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS; OR
2. RESIDES IN THE CAREGIVER’S HOUSEHOLD.
(i) “Harassment” includes:
(1) unwelcome and offensive conduct, which need not be severe or
pervasive, when:
(i) the conduct is based on race, color, religion, ancestry or national
origin, sex, age, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability, or military status; and
(ii) 1. submission to the conduct is made either explicitly or
implicitly a term or condition of employment of an individual;
2. submission to or rejection of the conduct is used as a basis
for employment decisions affecting the individual; or
3. based on the totality of the circumstances, the conduct
unreasonably creates a working environment that a reasonable person would perceive to
be abusive or hostile; and
(2) sexual harassment.
20–602.
It is the policy of the State, in the exercise of its police power for the protection of the
public safety, public health, and general welfare, for the maintenance of business and good
government, and for the promotion of the State’s trade, commerce, and manufacturers:
(1) to assure all persons equal opportunity in receiving employment and in
all labor management–union relations, regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry or
national origin, sex, age, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender
identity, military status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably
preclude the performance of the employment; and
(2) to that end, to prohibit discrimination in employment by any person.
20–606.

HOUSE BILL 724
(a) An employer may not:
(1) fail or refuse to hire, discharge, or otherwise discriminate against any
individual with respect to the individual’s compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment because of:
(i) the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic
information, military status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to
reasonably preclude the performance of the employment; or
(ii) the individual’s refusal to submit to a genetic test or make
available the results of a genetic test;
(2) limit, segregate, or classify its employees or applicants for employment
in any way that would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the individual’s status as an employee because
of:
(i) the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic
information, military status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to
reasonably preclude the performance of the employment; or
(ii) the individual’s refusal to submit to a genetic test or make
available the results of a genetic test;
(3) request or require genetic tests or genetic information as a condition of
hiring or determining benefits;
(4) fail or refuse to make a reasonable accommodation for the known
disability of an otherwise qualified employee or an applicant for employment; or
(5) engage in harassment of an employee.
(b) An employment agency may not:
(1) fail or refuse to refer for employment or otherwise discriminate against
any individual because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status,
or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance
of the employment; or
(2) classify or refer for employment any individual on the basis of the
individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, CAREGIVER
STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability unrelated in
nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the employment.

HOUSE BILL 724 5
(c) A labor organization may not:
(1) exclude or expel from its membership, or otherwise discriminate
against, any individual because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military
status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the
performance of the employment;
(2) limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or classify or fail or refuse
to refer for employment any individual, in any way that would deprive or tend to deprive
the individual of employment opportunities, limit the individual’s employment
opportunities, or otherwise adversely affect the individual’s status as an employee or as an
applicant for employment because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military
status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the
performance of the employment; or
(3) cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an
individual in violation of this section.
(d) An employer, labor organization, or joint labor–management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs, including on–the–job
training programs, may not discriminate against any individual in admission to, or
employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training or
retraining because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital
status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or
disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of
the employment.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an employer,
labor organization, or employment agency may not print or cause to be printed or published
any notice or advertisement relating to employment by the employer, membership in or any
classification or referral for employment by the labor organization, or any classification or
referral for employment by the employment agency that indicates any preference,
limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability,
or military status.
(2) A notice or advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation,
specification, or discrimination based on religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status,
CAREGIVER STATUS, disability, or military status if religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, disability, or military status is a bona fide
occupational qualification for employment.

HOUSE BILL 724
(f) An employer may not discriminate or retaliate against any of its employees or
applicants for employment, an employment agency may not discriminate against any
individual, and a labor organization may not discriminate or retaliate against any member
or applicant for membership because the individual has:
(1) opposed any practice prohibited by this subtitle; or
(2) made a charge, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an
investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this subtitle.
20–610.
(b) An employer may not:
(1) fail or refuse to offer an internship, terminate an internship, or
otherwise discriminate against an individual with respect to the terms, conditions, or
privileges of an internship because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, military
status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the
performance of the internship;
(2) limit, segregate, or classify its interns or applicants for internships in
any way that would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of internship opportunities
or otherwise adversely affect the individual’s status as an intern because of the individual’s
race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual
orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent
so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the internship;
(3) fail or refuse to make a reasonable accommodation for the known
disability of an otherwise qualified intern; or
(4) discriminate or retaliate against any of its interns or applicants for
internships because the individual has:
(i) opposed any practice prohibited by this subtitle; or
(ii) made a charge, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner
in an investigation, a proceeding, or a hearing under this subtitle.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an employer may
not print or cause to be printed or published any notice or advertisement relating to an
internship with the employer that indicates any preference, limitation, specification, or
discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status,
CAREGIVER STATUS, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or military status.
(2) A notice or an advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation,
specification, or discrimination based on religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status,

HOUSE BILL 724 7
CAREGIVER STATUS, disability, or military status if religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, CAREGIVER STATUS, disability, or military status is a bona fide
occupational qualification for the internship.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.